Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.080

Objections to approved claims.

Objection may be made by any interested person to any claim approved by the director, which objection shall be determined by the court upon such notice to the claimant and objector as the court shall prescribe.

[ 1994 c 92 s 114; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.080. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 67; 1915 c 98 s 8; RRS s 3274. Formerly RCW 30.44.080.]